South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5110.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 10-1-220.  (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Greenbelt project" means a public or quasi-public project intended to preserve open space, agricultural land, natural resources, or environmentally sensitive areas by restricting development, often through land acquisition, conservation easements, zoning controls, or economic incentives. (2) "Public incentive" means tax credits, deductions, exemptions, exclusions, fees in lieu of taxes, monetary benefits, appropriations, authorizations, subsidies, rebates, information required by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board regarding economic incentives, awards from the Governor's Closing Fund, assistance from the State provided on a discretionary basis to attract or retain business operations, and other preferential tax benefits given to businesses for the purpose of enticing certain actions. (B) Any greenbelt project that receives public incentives to acquire land must make the acquired land accessible to the public within three years of acquisition. If the provisions of this subsection are violated, any public incentives awarded to the greenbelt project must be repaid, with interest, within twenty-four months of the violation. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----